Hawaii, session 2026, SB436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 132-16.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established the office of the state fire marshal within the department of labor and industrial relations. The office shall be headed by a state fire marshal, who shall be appointed by the state fire council to serve for a term of five years.  No person shall serve as state fire marshal for more than three terms. The appointment of the state fire marshal shall be made without regard to chapters 76 and 89, and shall not be subject to the advice and consent of the senate.  In the event of a vacancy, the state fire council shall meet expeditiously to select and appoint a new state fire marshal to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.  The state fire marshal may hire staff as necessary." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________